Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201452-203
Lien; effect; priority; limitation;
enforcement; fee.

A lien created under section 52-202 is
in force from and after the date it is filed and is prior and paramount to
all other liens upon such property except those previously filed against such
property. Such lien shall be treated in all respects as an agricultural lien
as provided in article 9, Uniform Commercial Code, and may be enforced in
the manner and form provided for the enforcement of secured transactions as
provided in article 9, Uniform Commercial Code, except that such enforcement
proceedings shall be instituted within one year after the filing of such lien.
The lien is subject to the rights of purchasers of the property against which
the lien is filed when the purchasers acquired the property prior to the filing
of the lien without knowledge or notice of the rights of the persons performing
the work or furnishing material. The fee for filing, amending, or releasing
such lien shall be the same as set forth in section 9-525, Uniform Commercial
Code. Effective January 1,
2015, this section applies to a lien created under section 52-202 regardless
of when the lien was created.

Laws 1913, c. 123, § 3, p. 311;

R.S.1913, § 3843;

C.S.1922, § 3227;

C.S.1929, § 52-203;

R.S.1943, § 52-203;

Laws 1969, c. 436, § 1, p. 1463;

Laws 1984, LB 808, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 80;

Laws 1999, LB 550, § 11;

Laws 2001, LB 54, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB750, § 2.
April 11, 2014